California, session 20252026, SB344.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 7117 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:7117. (a) Cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains may be taken by boat from any harbor in this state, or by air, and scattered at sea. Cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains shall be removed from their container before the remains are scattered at sea.(b) Any person who scatters at sea, either from a boat or from the air, any cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains shall file with the local registrar of births and deaths in the county nearest the point where the remains were scattered, a verified statement containing the name of the deceased person, the time and place of death, the place at which the cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains were scattered, and any other information that the local registrar of births and deaths may require. The first copy of the endorsed permit shall be filed with the local registrar of births and deaths within 10 days of disposition. The third copy shall be returned to the office of issuance.(c) For purposes of this section, the phrase “at sea” includes the inland navigable waters of this state, exclusive of lakes and streams, provided that no such scattering may take place within 500 yards of the shoreline. This section does not allow the scattering of cremated human remains or hydrolyzed human remains from a bridge bridge, dock attached to the shore, or pier.(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the cremated remains or hydrolyzed human remains of a deceased person may be scattered at sea as provided in this section and Section 103060.(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.SEC. 2. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SECTION 1.Section 1375.1 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:1375.1.(a)Every plan shall have, and shall demonstrate to the director that it has, all of the following:(1)A fiscally sound operation and adequate provision against the risk of insolvency.(2)Assumed full financial risk on a prospective basis for the provision of covered health care services, except that a plan may obtain insurance or make other arrangements for the cost of providing to any subscriber or enrollee covered health care services, the aggregate value of which exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000) in any year, for the cost of covered health care services provided to its members other than through the plan because medical necessity required their provision before they could be secured through the plan, and for not more than 90 percent of the amount by which its costs for any of its fiscal years exceed 115 percent of its income for that fiscal year.(3)A procedure for prompt payment or denial of provider and subscriber or enrollee claims, including those telehealth services, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2290.5 of the Business and Professions Code, covered by the plan. Except as provided in Section 1371, a procedure meeting the requirements of Subchapter G of the regulations (29 C.F.R. Part 2560) under Public Law 93-406 (88 Stats. 829-1035, 29 U.S.C. Secs. 1001 et seq.) shall satisfy this requirement.(b)In determining whether the conditions of this section have been met, the director shall consider, but not be limited to, the following:(1)The financial soundness of the plan’s arrangements for health care services and the schedule of rates and charges used by the plan.(2)The adequacy of working capital.(3)Agreements with providers for the provision of health care services.(c)For the purposes of this section, “covered health care services” means health care services provided under all plan contracts.